test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-mingkwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230505: Csilla)

  Verb - миӈкве: # Verb 'to give' - full paradigm
    миӈкве+V+Inf: миӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: мыгум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: мыгын
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: мыг
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: мыгме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [мыгын, мыгы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: мыгыг
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: [мыгув, мыгӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [мыгын, мыгы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: мыгыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: мыглум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: мыглын
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: мыгтэ
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: мыглуме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: [мыглын, мыглы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: мыгтэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: [мыглув, мыглӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: [мыглын, мыглы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: мыганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: мыгагум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: мыгагын
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: мыгаге
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: мыгагме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: [мыгагын, мыгагы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: мыгаге̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: [мыгагув, мыгагӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: [мыгагын, мыгагы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: мыгаганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: мыганум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: [мыганын, мыган]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: мыганэ
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: мыганаме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: [мыганын, мыганы̄н, мыган]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: мыганэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: [мыганув, мыганӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: [мыганын, мыганы̄н, мыган]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: мыганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: мисум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: мисын
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: мис
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: мисме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [мисын, мисы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [мисыг, мисы̄г]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [мисув, мисӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [мисын, мисы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: мисыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: мислум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: мислын
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: мистэ
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg3: мислуме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [мислын, мислы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg3: мистэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: [мислув, мислӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [мислын, мислы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: мисаныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu3: мисагум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu3: мисагын
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu3: мисаге
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu3: мисагме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [мисагын, мисагы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu3: мисаге̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu3: [мисагув, мисагӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [мисагын, мисагы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: мисаганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: мисанум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [миса̄нын, мисан]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: мисанэ
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl3: [мисанаме̄н, мисанаме̄н, мисанме̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [мисанын, мисаны̄н, мисан]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl3: мисанэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: мисанув
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [мисанын, мисаны̄н, мисан]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: мисаныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [минувум, минӯвум]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [минувын, минӯвын]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: минув
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: минуваме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [минувын, минувы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [минувыг, минувы̄г]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [минувув, минувӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [минувын, минувы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [минувыт, минувы̄т]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: минувлум
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: минувлын
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: минувтэ
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg3: минувламе̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg3: [минувлын, минувлы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg3: минувтэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: [минувлув, минувлӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: [минувлын, минувлы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: [минуваныл, минува̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu3: [минувагум, минува̄гум]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu3: [минувагын, минува̄гын]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu3: [минуваге, минува̄ге]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu3: минувагме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu3: [минувагын, минувагы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu3: минуваге̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu3: [минувагув, минувагӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu3: [минувагын, минувагы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu3: [минуваганыл, минувага̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: [минуванум, минува̄нум]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: [минуванын, минува̄нын]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: [минуванэ, минува̄нэ]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl3: минуванме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl3: [минуванын, минуваны̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl3: минуванэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: минуванув
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: [минуванын, минуваны̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: [минуваныл, минува̄ныл]

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: маен
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [маен, мае̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [маен, мае̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: [маелн, мае̄лн]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [мае̄лн, мае̄лы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [мае̄лн, мае̄лы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: [маегын, мае̄гн]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [маегын, маегы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [маегын, маегы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [маен, мае̄н, мае̄нын]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [маен, мае̄н, мае̄нын, мае̄ны̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [маен, мае̄н, мае̄нын, мае̄ны̄н]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: мивем
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: мивен
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: миве
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: мивеме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [мивен, миве̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: миве̄г
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: миве̄в
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [мивен, миве̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: мивет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: майве̄сум
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: майве̄сын
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [майвес, майве̄с]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: майвесаме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [майвесын, майвесы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: майвесы̄г
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [майвесув, майвесӯв]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [майвесын, майвесы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: майве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [минувем, минӯвем]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [минувен, минӯвен]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [минуве, минӯве]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: минувеме̄н
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [минувен, минуве̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [минувег, минуве̄г]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: минуве̄в
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [минувен, минуве̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [минувет, минӯвет]

#Passive, imperative conjugation
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: мыгвен
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [мыгвен, мыгве̄н]
    миӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [мыгвен, мыгве̄н]

#Present participle
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc: минэ
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: минэм
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: минэн
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: минэ̄тэ
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: минэме̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: минэнэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [минэг, минэ̄г]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: минэ̄в
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [минэн, минэ̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [минэныл, минэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, single object
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: минэ̄лум
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: [минэ̄лн, минэ̄лын]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: минэ̄тэ
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: минэламе̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: минэлы̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: минэтэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [минэлув, минэлӯв]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: минэлы̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [минэ̄нл, минэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, dual object
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: минэ̄гум
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: [минэ̄гн, минэ̄гын]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: минэ̄гэ
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: минэгаме̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: минэгы̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: минэгэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [минэгув, минэгӯв]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: минэгагы̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: минэгаганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: минэ̄нум
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: минэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: минэ̄нэ
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: [минэнаме̄н, минэнанме̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: [минэны̄н, минэныны̄н, минэнаны̄н] 
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [минэнэ̄н, минэнанэ̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [минэнув, минэнӯв, минэнанув, минэнанӯв]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [минэны̄н, минэнаны̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [минэ̄нл, минэ̄наныл]

#Past participle
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc: мим
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: мимум
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: мимын
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: миме
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: мимаме̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [мимын, мимы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: мимыг
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [мимув, мимӯв]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [мимын, миммы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: мимыт

#Past participle, single object
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: мимлум
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: мимлын
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: мимтэ
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: мимламе̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: мимлы̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: мимтэ̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [мимлув, мимлӯв]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: мимлы̄н
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: миманыл

#Past participle, dual object
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: мимагум
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: мимагын
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: мимаге
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [мимагаме̄н, мимагагме̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [мимагы̄н, мимагагы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [мимагы̄г, мимагагы̄г]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [мимагув, мимагӯв]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [мимагы̄н, мимагагы̄н]
    миӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [мимагагыл, мимагаганыл]
